Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 3.7
TUITION ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAM

Section

23-3.7-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares: That the costs of education at Colorado's public and nonpublic institutions of higher education have increased dramatically in recent years; that while the increased costs of education at public institutions have been defrayed by state support of such institutions Coloradans wishing to attend nonpublic institutions of higher education in the state face a serious financial burden; that the decline of Colorado's nonpublic institutions of higher education due to an absence of students able to bear the costs of education would increase the number of students seeking admission to state-funded institutions; and that the preservation of Colorado's traditional diversity in higher education and access to a variety of educational opportunities for Coloradans of all backgrounds and resources require that the general assembly act to assist in-state students in meeting the increased costs of education at Colorado's nonpublic institutions of higher education.

Source:

L. 86:

Entire article added, p. 824, § 1, effective July 1.

23-3.7-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 3.7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education.

"In-state student" means a student at a nonpublic institution of higher education who meets the criteria established by article 7 of this title for classification as an in-state student at a state institution of higher education, who is pursuing a degree, and who is a graduate of a high school located in Colorado. "In-state student" includes a member of the armed forces of the United States or his dependents.

"Nonpublic institution of higher education" means an institution of higher education operating in this state that:

Receives no support from general fund moneys in support of its operating costs;

Admits as regular students only persons having a certification of graduation from a school providing secondary education or the recognized equivalent of such a certificate;

Is accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency or association and, in the case of private occupational schools, holds a certificate of approval from the private occupational school division in accordance with the provisions of article 64 of this title 23, or is regulated or approved pursuant to any other statute;

Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's degree or a graduate degree; or

Provides not less than a two-year program that is acceptable for full credit towards such a degree; or

Provides not less than a one-year program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation; or

Is a private occupational school providing not less than a six-month program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation;

Was in operation in this state as of January 1, 1999, or has been in operation in this state for a minimum of ten academic years; and

Is not a branch program or campus of an institution of higher education whose principal campus and facilities are located outside this state, unless the institution operating the branch program has received a certificate of approval from the private occupational school division in accordance with the provisions of article 64 of this title 23.

"Professional degree in theology" means a certificate signifying a person's graduation from a degree program that is:

Devotional in nature or designed to induce religious faith; and

Offered by an institution as preparation for a career in the clergy.

Source:

L. 86:

Entire article added, p. 824, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 75, § 3, effective July 1, 2000.

L. 2009:

(3)(f) amended and (4) added, (HB 09-1267), ch. 348, p. 1824, § 6, effective June 1.

L. 2017:

IP, (3)(c), and (3)(f) amended, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1206, § 14, effective August 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act amending subsection (3)(f) and adding subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.

23-3.7-103. Tuition assistance grant program - authorization - administration.

The general assembly hereby authorizes the commission to establish and administer a tuition assistance grant program within the scholarship and grant program for in-state students attending nonpublic institutions of higher education in this state.

An in-state student may apply to an eligible nonpublic institution of higher education for a grant at any time after his or her acceptance by such nonpublic institution of higher education. The commission shall award grants, out of moneys in the fund created in section 23-3.7-107, for such students to such institutions in accordance with criteria established by the commission. In establishing this criteria the commission shall include, but not be limited to, the consideration of need and merit. The criteria shall also include:

A prohibition against the awarding of any financial assistance pursuant to this article to a student who is pursuing a professional degree in theology; except that the prohibition described in this section shall not apply to financial assistance that is awarded to a student from a federal program, including but not limited to Title IV of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1070, as amended; and

A requirement that a nonpublic institution of higher education that seeks to award financial assistance to a student pursuant to this article certify that the student is not pursuing a professional degree in theology.

Grants, except in the case of part-time students, shall be for not more than one thousand five hundred dollars per academic year, and no student may receive more than one grant per academic year.

Students enrolled on less than a full-time but more than a half-time basis shall be eligible for prorated grants as determined by the commission.

A grant shall be awarded for not more than four academic years of credit, which shall be completed within twelve years of the initial award of such grant. Such grant may be renewed annually in accordance with criteria established by the commission in subsection (2) of this section and shall include the consideration of the student's performance and circumstances since the initial award of such grant.

Grants shall be transmitted to nonpublic institutions of higher education on behalf of in-state students at the time of registration by the students.

If an in-state student discontinues attendance at a nonpublic institution of higher education before the end of the academic term for which a grant has been transmitted on his behalf, the institution shall remit the unused portion of such student's grant to the commission as determined by the commission.

Source:

L. 86:

Entire article added, p. 825, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (HB 09-1267), ch. 348, p. 1825, § 7, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.

23-3.7-104. Determination of eligibility of institution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire article added, p. 826, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (HB 09-1267), ch. 348, p. 1827, § 12, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.

23-3.7-105. Audit.

The state auditor, in cooperation with the commission, shall establish procedures for biannual audits at institutions participating in the grant program.

Source:

L. 86:

Entire article added, p. 826, § 1, effective July 1.

23-3.7-106. Rules.

The commission shall promulgate such rules as may be necessary for the implementation of this article.

Source:

L. 86:

Entire article added, p. 826, § 1, effective July 1.

23-3.7-107. Gifts and bequests to commission for grant program.

The commission is authorized to receive gifts, grants, and bequests of money from any private source to be credited to the tuition assistance grant program cash fund, which is hereby created. The commission shall hold such funds, invest them, and use the principal thereof or the interest thereon in the awarding of grants pursuant to the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 86:

Entire article added, p. 826, § 1, effective July 1.